Alaska, session 34, HB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Community Block Grants (HD 1-40) 6,315,000 65,000 6,250,000 10 Alaska Energy Authority - Electrical 350,000 350,000 11 Emergencies Program (HD 1-40) 12 Alaska Energy Authority - Cruise Ship 15,300,000 15,300,000 13 Terminal Port Electrification (HD 1-40) 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Village Safe Water and Wastewater 272,500,000 18,000,000 254,500,000 18 Infrastructure Projects (HD 1-40) 19 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 628,100 628,100 20 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants (HD 1-40) 21 Water Small System Assistance Grants 3,000,000 3,000,000 22 (HD 1-40) 23 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 9,457,000 9,457,000 24 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants - Emerging 25 Contaminants (HD 1-40) 26 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 4,177,800 4,177,800 27 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 28 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 7,224,600 7,224,600 29 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI (HD 1- 30 40) 31 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 1,273,000 1,273,000 01 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants - IIJA, 02 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 03 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 5,344,000 5,344,000 04 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 05 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 12,200,100 12,200,100 06 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI (HD 1- 07 40) 08 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 7,640,000 7,640,000 09 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants- IIJA, 10 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Alaska Marine Salmon Program (HD 1- 825,000 825,000 15 40) 16 Gulf of Alaska Chinook Salmon (HD 1- 3,300,000 3,300,000 17 40) 18 Wildlife Management, Research and 6,000,000 6,000,000 19 Hunting Access (HD 1-40) 20 Sport Fish Recreational Boating and 3,000,000 3,000,000 21 Angler Access (HD 1-40) 22 Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund 6,800,000 6,800,000 23 (HD 1-40) 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Public Protection and Infrastructure 5,000,000 5,000,000 28 Support (HD 1-40) 29 Air National Guard Modernization and 1,750,000 1,750,000 30 Sustainment (HD 1-40) 31 State Homeland Security Grant 26,765,900 26,765,900 01 Programs (HD 1-40) 02 DMVA Deferred Maintenance, 25,000,000 25,000,000 03 Replacement, and Renewal (HD 1-40) 04 National Guard Counterdrug Support (HD 200,000 200,000 05 1-40) 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Forest Inventory Initiative - Susitna and 1,850,000 1,850,000 10 Tanana Valleys (HD 1-40) 11 Land Sales New Subdivision 600,000 600,000 12 Development (HD 1-40) 13 Statewide Parks Safety, Sanitation, and 1,000,000 1,000,000 14 Access Improvements (HD 1-40) 15 Land and Water Conservation Fund 4,800,000 1,900,000 2,900,000 16 (LWCF) Grant Program (HD 1-40) 17 Cooperative Water Resource Program 400,000 400,000 18 Pass-through to USGS for Stream 19 Gauging Projects (HD 1-40) 20 Cooperative Forestry and Fire Programs 12,000,000 12,000,000 21 (HD 1-40) 22 Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation 4,330,000 4,330,000 23 Federal Program (HD 1-40) 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 28 AHFC Rental Assistance for Persons 1,500,000 1,500,000 29 Displaced Due to Domestic Violence - 30 Empowering Choice Housing Program 31 (ECHP) (HD 1-40) 01 AHFC Rural Professional Housing (HD 1- 5,000,000 4,000,000 1,000,000 02 40) 03 AHFC Affordable Housing Development 15,000,000 15,000,000 04 Program (HD 1-40) 05 AHFC Senior Citizens Housing 3,000,000 3,000,000 06 Development Program (HD 1-40) 07 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 4,750,000 750,000 4,000,000 08 Federal HOME Grant (HD 1-40) 09 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 3,750,000 3,750,000 10 Capital Fund Program (HD 1-40) 11 AHFC Federal and Other Competitive 7,500,000 1,500,000 6,000,000 12 Grants (HD 1-40) 13 AHFC Competitive Grants for Public 1,350,000 350,000 1,000,000 14 Housing (HD 1-40) 15 AHFC Supplemental Housing 4,000,000 4,000,000 16 Development Program (HD 1-40) 17 AHFC Energy Programs Weatherization 5,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000 18 (HD 1-40) 19 AHFC Federal and Other Competitive 35,000,000 35,000,000 20 Grants - Alaska Sustainable Energy 21 Corporation (HD 1-40) 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Federal Program Match (HD 1-40) 130,859,460 109,759,960 21,099,500 26 Federal-Aid Highway 1,000,000 27 Project Title 23 Receipts 28 (HD 1-40) 29 Federal-Aid Highway State 93,258,500 30 Match (HD 1-40) 31 Other Federal Program 1,681,460 01 Match (HD 1-40) 02 Federal-Aid Highway 1,000,000 03 Project Match Credits (HD 1- 04 40) 05 Federal-Aid Aviation State 33,919,500 06 Match (HD 1-40) 07 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 27,500,000 27,500,000 08 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 09 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation (HD 1-40) 10 Public Building Fund Deferred 6,000,000 6,000,000 11 Maintenance, Renovation, Repair and 12 Equipment (HD 1-40) 13 Surface Transportation Program (HD 1- 890,212,300 890,212,300 14 40) 15 Airport Improvement Program (HD 1-40) 344,438,386 344,438,386 16 Rural Airport Improvement 165,000,000 17 Program (HD 1-40) 18 Alaska International Airport 179,438,386 19 System (HD 1-40) 20 Statewide Federal Programs (HD 1-40) 64,677,800 64,677,800 21 Cooperative Reimbursable 15,000,000 22 Projects (HD 1-40) 23 Federal Transit 20,757,800 24 Administration Grants (HD 1- 25 40) 26 Highway Safety Grants 10,920,000 27 Program (HD 1-40) 28 Commercial Vehicle 3,000,000 29 Enforcement Program (HD 1- 30 40) 31 Emergency Relief Funding 15,000,000 01 (HD 1-40) 02 State Equipment Fleet Replacement (HD 39,000,000 39,000,000 03 1-40) 04 Winter Trail Grooming Grants (HD 1-40) 120,000 120,000 05 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 6,250,000 06 1003 General Fund Match 65,000 07 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 350,000 08 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 15,300,000 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $21,965,000 10 Department of Environmental Conservation 11 1002 Federal Receipts 267,085,100 12 1003 General Fund Match 18,000,000 13 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 12,675,400 14 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 25,184,100 15 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 16 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $323,444,600 17 Department of Fish and Game 18 1002 Federal Receipts 13,050,000 19 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 4,125,000 20 1024 Fish and Game Fund 2,750,000 21 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $19,925,000 22 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 23 1002 Federal Receipts 58,715,900 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $58,715,900 25 Department of Natural Resources 26 1002 Federal Receipts 19,230,000 27 1003 General Fund Match 1,900,000 28 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 1,000,000 29 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 400,000 30 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 600,000 31 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,850,000 01 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $24,980,000 02 Department of Revenue 03 1002 Federal Receipts 63,250,000 04 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 5,500,000 05 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 17,100,000 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $85,850,000 07 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 08 1002 Federal Receipts 1,245,618,331 09 1003 General Fund Match 107,759,960 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,000,000 11 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 12 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 59,877,805 13 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 27,500,000 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 10,000,000 15 1147 Public Building Fund 6,000,000 16 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 4,931,850 17 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 18 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,502,807,946 19 * * * Total Budget * * * $2,037,688,446 20 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 127,724,960 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 4,125,000 07 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 17,100,000 08 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $148,949,960 09 Designated General Funds 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 3,000,000 11 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 27,500,000 12 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 600,000 13 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,850,000 14 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 350,000 15 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 16 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $33,420,000 17 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 18 1024 Fish and Game Fund 2,750,000 19 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 59,877,805 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 16,400,000 21 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 4,931,850 22 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 15,300,000 23 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $99,259,655 24 Other Duplicated Funds 25 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 26 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 12,675,400 27 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 25,184,100 28 1147 Public Building Fund 6,000,000 29 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $82,859,500 30 Federal Receipts 31 1002 Federal Receipts 1,673,199,331 01 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $1,673,199,331 02 * * * Total Budget * * * $2,037,688,446 03 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Statewide Federal Programs (HD 1-40) 459,000 459,000 10 Highway Safety Grants 59,000 11 Program (HD 1-40) 12 Federal Transit 400,000 13 Administration Grants (HD 1- 14 40) 15 Federal Program Match (HD 1-40) 69,695,087 69,695,087 16 Other Federal Program 1,611,548 17 Match (HD 1-40) 18 Federal-Aid Highway State 58,276,155 19 Match (HD 1-40) 20 Federal-Aid Aviation State 9,807,384 21 Match (HD 1-40) 22 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 05 1003 General Fund Match 69,695,087 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 459,000 07 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $70,154,087 08 * * * Total Budget * * * $70,154,087 09 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 69,695,087 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 459,000 07 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $70,154,087 08 Designated General Funds 09 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $0 10 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 11 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $0 12 Other Duplicated Funds 13 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $0 14 Federal Receipts 15 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $0 16 * * * Total Budget * * * $70,154,087 17 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND 02 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be 03 $650,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 14, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 117, lines 19 - 20, 04 (Alaska Energy Authority - Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Plan - $1,500,000), is 05 reappropriated to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 06 Alaska Energy Authority, for federal matching of the United States Department of Energy 07 State Energy Program. 08 * Sec. 8. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. Federal receipts, designated 09 program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program receipts under 10 AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of 11 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the Alaska marine highway system fund 12 under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the vaccine assessment account (AS 18.09.230), receipts 13 of the University of Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment 14 working capital fund under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing 15 operations under AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 16 2027, and that exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on 17 compliance with the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). 18 * Sec. 9. INSURANCE CLAIMS. The amounts to be received in settlement of insurance 19 claims for losses and the amounts to be received as recovery for losses are appropriated from 20 the general fund to the 21 (1) state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)); or 22 (2) appropriate state agency to mitigate the loss. 23 * Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 24 DEVELOPMENT. (a) The amount received for Community Development Block Grant 25 Disaster Recovery programs is appropriated to the Department of Commerce, Community, 26 and Economic Development for Disaster Recovery Programs. 27 (b) Tax credits available from the federal government for certain renewable energy 28 projects funded by the Alaska Energy Authority, estimated to be $0, are appropriated to the 29 Alaska Energy Authority for continued funding of renewable energy projects or matching 30 funds for federal grants. 31 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. (a) The proceeds received by the 01 Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of 02 state-owned vessels and aircraft purchased without using federal funds, estimated to be 03 $150,000, are appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and 04 maintenance of vessels and aircraft. 05 (b) The proceeds received by the Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal year 06 ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of state-owned equipment purchased by the Department 07 of Fish and Game for federal projects using federal funds, estimated to be $200,000, are 08 appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and maintenance 09 of equipment to facilitate the same federal projects. 10 * Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. (a) The proceeds received by the 11 Department of Public Safety during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of 12 state-owned vessels and surplus vessel parts and accessories, estimated to be $150,000, are 13 appropriated to the Department of Public Safety for renewal, replacement, and maintenance of 14 vessels. 15 (b) The proceeds received by the Department of Public Safety during the fiscal year 16 ending June 30, 2027, from the sale of state-owned aircraft and surplus aircraft parts and 17 accessories, estimated to be $150,000, are appropriated to the Department of Public Safety for 18 renewal, replacement, and maintenance of aircraft. 19 * Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. The 20 amount appropriated to the Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565) for the fiscal year 21 ending June 30, 2027, estimated to be $26,312,800, is appropriated from the Alaska capital 22 income fund to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for statewide critical 23 deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 24 * Sec. 14. LAPSE (a) The appropriations made in secs. 1, 4, 7, 8, 9(2), and 10 - 13 of this 25 Act are for capital projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 26 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 9(1) of this Act is for the capitalization of a fund 27 and does not lapse. 28 * Sec. 15. Sections 4 - 7 of this Act take effect June 30, 2026. 29 * Sec. 16. Except as provided in sec. 15 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.